Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1710
Continuing contract, defined.

Continuing contract shall mean a contract for professional services entered into in accordance with the procedures of sections 81-1701 to 81-1721 between an agency and a firm whereby the firm provides professional services to the agency for work of a specified nature as outlined in the contract required by the agency with no time limitation. Any such contract shall provide a termination clause.

Laws 1978, LB 715, § 10.